Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.271

Failure to register—Late filing fee—Notice to attorney general.

(1) If the secretary or attorney general determines that any entity is soliciting in this state, directly or indirectly, by any means, and has not registered with the secretary as required by this chapter, the secretary may notify the charitable organization or commercial fund-raiser of its registration requirements by postal or electronic means.

(2) The secretary may notify the attorney general of any entity liable for late filing fees under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Any entity who, after notification by the secretary, fails to properly register under this chapter is subject to a late filing fee in an amount to be established by rule by the end of the first business day following the issuance of the notice. The late filing fee is in addition to any other filing fee provided by this chapter.

(4) If the secretary or attorney general determines that any entity is soliciting in this state, directly or indirectly, by any means, and the entity has not registered with the secretary as required by this chapter, the secretary, after five days notice sent by postal or electronic means to the charitable organization or commercial fund-raiser, may publish a press release in newspapers or on the internet, a notice to the public regarding the entity's unregistered status.

[ 2011 c 199 s 18; 1993 c 471 s 8; 1986 c 230 s 17.]